Utah statutes.
23-15-6.   Pollution of waters unlawful.

It is unlawful for any person to pollute any waters deemed necessary by the Wildlife Board for wildlife purposes or any waters containing protected aquatic wildlife and stoneflies (Plecoptera), mayflies (Ephemoptera), dragonflies and damsel flies (Odonata), water bugs (Hemiptera), caddis flies (Trichoptera), spongilla flies (Neuroptera), and crustaceans. Provided further that each day of pollution shall constitute a separate offense.

